Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.330

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Notice of appeal—Filing party—Certification and filing.

The filing party, within ten days of filing the notice of appeal shall notify in writing the chair of the school board of the taking of the appeal, and within twenty days thereafter the school board shall at its expense file the complete transcript of the evidence and the papers and exhibits relating to the decision complained of, all properly certified to be correct.

[ 2016 c 93 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 398; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.470. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.58.470, 28.58.470.]